District of Columbia statutes.
7-1752

Prohibition on sale of cigarettes that are not fire-standard-compliant.

No cigarette may be sold or offered for sale in the District of Columbia unless:

(1)

It has been tested in accordance with the test method specified in § 7-1753(a)(2);

(2)

It meets the performance standard required by § 7-1753(a)(4);

(3)

The manufacturer has filed a written certification with the Mayor, or the Mayor’s delegate, in accordance with § 7-1754; and

(4)

It has been marked in accordance with § 7-1754(b).

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-157, § 3, 55 DCR 3703